Nebraska, session 109, LB160.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-216.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-216.01 (1) An applicant who fails to pass the barber examination may
take the examination up to two additional times when the examination is offered
by the board without being required to take any further course of study. If an
applicant fails the examination a third time, the applicant shall be required
to complete a further course of study in barbering, consisting of five hundred
hours with not more than ten hours completed in any one working day in a school
of barbering prior to further examination.
(2) An applicant may be given an opportunity to demonstrate proficiency to
waive the remainder of the course of study after completion of two hundred
fifty hours with the approval of the board. If such applicant fails the
examination after being given such opportunity, the applicant shall complete
the remaining two hundred fifty hours before such applicant shall be permitted
to take the examination a fifth time.
A graduate from a school of barbering who fails to pass a satisfactory
examination may take the examination next time that the examination is given by
the Board of Barber Examiners without being required to take any further course
of study. Should the applicant fail the examination a second time, the
applicant shall be required to complete a further course of study of not less
than five hundred hours to be completed within three months of not more than
ten hours in any one working day in a school of barbering approved by the Board
of Barber Examiners before the applicant may be permitted to take the
examination a third time.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-216.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-